Georgia statutes. TITLE 32 Highways, Bridges, and Ferries
Article 4 Limited-access Roads

32-6-110.
“Local service road” defined.

As used in this article, the term “local service road” means any public road, whether existing at the time of the designation of a limited-access road or established thereafter, which serves the owner or occupant of any land or improvements abutting a limited-access road and which gives a means of ingress to and egress from any such lands or improvements.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 559, § 2; Code 1933, § 95A-935, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

32-6-111.
Establishment and maintenance of limited-access roads.

The department or a county or a municipality in this state, acting alone or in cooperation with each other or with any federal, state, or local agency, is authorized and empowered to plan, designate, establish, regulate, abandon, alter, improve, maintain, and provide limited-access public roads wherever the department or such authorities consider that traffic conditions, present or future, justify such special facilities, provided that the term “traffic conditions, present or future, justifying such special facilities” shall be construed to mean a road having present traffic volumes requiring a minimum of four lanes of road or traffic volumes estimated to be accommodated by the road within a period not to exceed 20 years from the date of such consideration that will require a minimum of four lanes of road; provided, further, that within municipalities such authorization for limited-access public roads shall be subject to such municipal consent as may be provided by law, except that such municipal consent is not necessary for any limited-access road if the limited-access road includes space or other provisions for the construction of a heavy rail line as a part of a public transportation system or a rapid busway operating on a designated lane as a part of a public transportation system and such public transportation system is a part of a regional transportation plan developed by the metropolitan planning organization or other such similar body.

The department or a county or a municipality, in addition to the specific powers granted in this article, also shall have and may exercise, relative to limited-access facilities, any and all additional authority vested in them relative to other public roads in their jurisdiction.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 559, § 3; Code 1933, § 95A-936, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 163, § 1.

Cross references.

Manner of operation of motor vehicles on divided highways and controlled-access roadways, §

40-6-50

et seq.

32-6-112.
Acquisition of property and property rights.

The department, a county, or a municipality may acquire private property and property rights for limited-access facilities and service roads, including rights of access, of view, of air, and of light through gift, devise, purchase, or condemnation in the same manner as such governmental units are authorized by law to acquire such property or property rights in connection with public roads within their respective jurisdictions. Public property or an interest therein may be acquired for such purposes by the department or by a county or municipality by any method authorized by law for such acquisition other than condemnation. The acquisition of public property or an interest therein for such purposes by condemnation may be accomplished by the department pursuant to the provisions of subsection (b) of Code Section 32-3-4 when such acquisition is approved by the State Commission on the Condemnation of Public Property as provided in Code Section 50-16-183. As used in this Code section, the term “public property” has the meaning provided for in Code Section 50-16-180. In the process of acquiring property or property rights for any limited-access facility, the department or the county or municipality, in its discretion, may acquire an entire lot, block, or tract of land if, by so doing, the interest of the public will best be served.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 559, § 5; Code 1933, § 95A-938, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1187, § 5.

Law reviews.

For annual survey of local government law, see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 289 (1986).

32-6-113.
Design of limited-access roads.

Limited-access roads may be so designed as to regulate, restrict, or prohibit access thereto so as to best serve the traffic for which such facility is intended. The authority designating and establishing any limited-access road is authorized to divide and separate such highway into separate roadways by the construction of raised curbings, central dividing sections, or other physical separations or by designating such separate roadways by signs, markers, or stripes; to designate the proper lanes for traffic moving in opposite directions; and to prohibit the making of turns at specified points. The designating authority may recommend to the commissioner of public safety or, if the roads in question are in a municipality, to the municipality that there be fixed on such roads and on the separate lanes thereof such rates of speed as are deemed in the public interest. No person shall have any right of ingress to or egress from or passage across any limited-access road to or from abutting lands except at the designated points to which access may be permitted and under such arrangements and conditions as may be specified from time to time.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 559, § 4; Code 1933, § 95A-937, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

32-6-114.
Designation of limited-access roads; elimination of intersections at grade.

The department, a county, or a municipality may designate and establish limited-access roads as new or additional facilities or may designate or establish existing public roads to be limited-access roads. The department or the counties or municipalities shall have authority to provide for the elimination of intersections at grade of limited-access highways with existing state, county, or municipal public roads or railroad rights of way by grade separation or local service roads or by closing off such roads or streets at the right of way boundary line of such limited-access road. After the establishment of any limited-access road, no public road which is not a part of such facility shall intersect the same at grade. No public road shall be opened into or connected with any established limited-access road without the consent of the governmental authority having jurisdiction of such limited-access road, in the same manner as such governmental units are authorized by law.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 559, § 6; Code 1933, § 95A-939, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

Cross references.

Elimination of railroad grade crossings, §

32-6-193

et seq.

32-6-115.
Conducting commercial enterprises or activities on property on which limited-access roads have been constructed.

Except as otherwise provided in this Code section and Code Section 32-6-116, no commercial enterprise or activities shall be authorized or conducted by the department or any other agency or by a county or municipality of the state, within or on the property on which have been constructed limited-access roads as defined in this article, provided that the term “commercial enterprise or activities” shall not be so construed as to prevent the installation of public utility facilities, to the extent that it is authorized by law, or as to prevent the proper management of property acquired for future construction of public roads, including limited-access roads, as such acquisition is authorized in Article 1 of Chapter 3 of this title.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 559, § 3; Code 1933, § 95A-936, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1973, p. 1401, § 1.

32-6-116.
Installation and operation of vending machines in safety rest areas on rights of way of state highway system.

The department is authorized to install or provide for the installation of and to operate or provide for the operation of vending machines in safety rest areas constructed on or located on the rights of way of the state highway system. The vending machines may dispense nonalcoholic beverages, snacks, candy, cigarettes, and other articles as determined by the department to be necessary or desirable for the traveling public at reasonable prices. The prices charged for these products shall approximate the prevailing rate within the area for similar items so as not to compete unfairly with private enterprise, such prices to be set by the department.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-936.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1979, p. 132, § 3.

Cross references.

Authority of department to provide information to traveling public at safety rest areas, §

32-2-4

.

32-6-117.
Lease of air rights.

The department is authorized to lease by negotiation air rights over existing or proposed limited-access highways for development as commercial enterprises or activities. Prior to entering into any negotiations for the lease of such air rights, the department shall advertise its intent to negotiate the lease of such air rights at least once a week for four consecutive weeks in one or more newspapers of general circulation in the county or counties where the air rights to be leased are situated and in one or more legal organs in Fulton County. Any person, firm, or corporation leasing such air rights shall reimburse the department for all costs, including administrative costs, incurred by the department in connection with the negotiation of said lease. Furthermore, when two or more offers are received by the department for a lease of air rights, the highest responsible offer shall be accepted by the department. The department shall establish a minimum negotiated price, based upon competent appraisal; and the final negotiated amount shall not be less than this appraisal.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-936, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 1401, § 1.

32-6-118.
Establishment, maintenance, and disposal of local service roads.

In connection with the development of any limited-access facility, the department, a county, or a municipality is authorized to plan, designate, establish, use, regulate, alter, improve, maintain, abandon, and dispose of local service roads or streets or to designate as local service roads any existing public road and to exercise jurisdiction over service roads in the same manner as authorized over any other public roads on their public road systems if such local service roads are deemed necessary or desirable. Such local service roads shall be of appropriate design and shall be separated from the limited-access facility property by means of any or all devices designated as necessary or desirable by the proper authority.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 559, § 7; Code 1933, § 95A-940, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

32-6-119.
Effect of article on Coastal Highway District and Coastal Scenic Highway Authority.

This article shall in no way take away from, impair, or infringe upon the authority, duty, power, or obligations of the Coastal Highway District or the Coastal Scenic Highway Authority.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 559, § 9; Code 1933, § 95A-941, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.